Mississippi statutes. Title 61. Aviation
Chapter 3. Airport Authorities
§ 61-3-24.
Lien on aircraft that land at airport for full amount of landing fees or other charges; enforcement of lien.

An authority, at which a commercial airline lands an aircraft operating under its Federal Aviation Administration certificate, shall have a lien upon all aircraft that land at the authority’s airport by the airline for the full amount of any landing fees, or other rates and charges previously promulgated by the authority in its rules and regulations, incurred by the airline at the airport by any aircraft operating under the airline’s Federal Aviation Administration certificate.

An authority may enforce any lien created herein against a nonresident debtor airline pursuant to the following procedure: a court of appropriate jurisdiction may issue a writ of sequestration, ex parte, against any aircraft operating under the Federal Aviation Administration certificate of the nonresident debtor airline and located at the airport operated by the authority. However, before issuing a writ of sequestration, the court shall find there is prima facie evidence that the nonresident debtor airline is past due on the landing fees or other rates and charges, that the authority has submitted prima facie evidence of exigent circumstances for the issuance of the writ, and that the authority has submitted a corporate surety bond in the amount of one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the past-due amount claimed. Upon issuing the writ of sequestration, the court shall grant the nonresident debtor airline an opportunity for an immediate evidentiary hearing to rebut the authority’s claim and revoke the writ. The court shall allow the nonresident debtor airline to substitute in place of the sequestered aircraft a corporate surety bond with the court in the amount of one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the past-due amount claimed by the authority for the purpose of securing payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2012.).

§ 61-3-25.
Acceptance of federal and state aid; designation of agent.

An authority is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and state monies and other monies, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish, in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal monies accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law. All state monies accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the state.

An authority is authorized to designate the Mississippi Transportation Commission as its agent to accept, receive, receipt for, and disburse federal and state monies, and other monies, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this chapter, and an authority is authorized to designate such commission as its agent in contracting for and supervising the planning, acquisition, development, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment or operation of any airport or other air navigation facility. An authority may enter into an agreement with the commission prescribing the terms and conditions of the agency in accordance with such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States, if federal money is involved, and in accordance with the applicable laws of this state. All federal monies accepted under this section by the commission shall be accepted and transferred or expended by such commission upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States. All monies received by the commission pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the State Treasury, and unless otherwise prescribed by the agency from which such monies were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the monies were made available, and held by the state in trust for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-43; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 13; Laws, 1992, ch. 379, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 61-3-27.
Issuance of bonds; attorneys’ services.

An authority shall have the power to borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and issue its bonds therefor, including refunding bonds, which bonds may be payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources. Any bonds of an authority issued pursuant to this chapter which are payable, as to principal and interest, solely from revenues of an airport or air navigation facility (and they shall so state on their face) shall not constitute a debt of any municipality, the state, or any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing such bonds shall be liable personally thereon by reason of the issuance thereof, provided the issuance is in compliance with this chapter.

An authority proposing to issue bonds or notes as defined in this chapter of any kind, nature, or description shall have, prior to authorization, issuance, and subsequent validation thereof, secured the legal services of a competent practicing attorney or firm of attorneys. In no instance shall the attorney’s fees paid for the issuance or refunding of such bonds exceed the following amounts, to wit:

On all such bond issues the attorney’s fees shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00); one-half percent (1/2%) of all over five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) and not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00); and one-fourth percent (1/4%) of all amounts in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-29.
Issuance of bonds; authorization resolution.

The issuance of bonds by an authority shall be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of such authority. Every such resolution shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of at least three-fifths (3/5) of all the members of such governing body.

A resolution in compliance with this section shall include any covenants with the bondholders deemed necessary by the commissioners to make such bonds secure and marketable, including, but without limitation, covenants regarding the application of the bond proceeds; the pledging, application and securing of the revenues of the authority, the creation and maintenance of reserves; the investment of funds; the issuance of additional bonds; the maintenance of minimum fees, charges and rentals; the operation and maintenance of its airport; insurance and insurance proceeds; accounts and audits; the sale of airport properties; remedies of bondholders; the vesting in a trustee or trustees such powers and rights as may be necessary to secure the bonds and the revenues and funds from which they are payable; the terms and conditions upon which bondholders may exercise their rights and remedies; the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; the definition, consequences and remedies of an event of default; the amendment of such resolution; and the appointment of a receiver in the event of a default.

Upon final enactment, each resolution authorizing bonds shall be published in full.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-31.
Grounds for contesting validation of bonds.

After the publication of such authorizing resolution or amendatory resolution, if any, the validation of the bonds authorized thereby may be contested only if:

Such bonds were authorized for an objective or purpose for which the political subdivision is not authorized to expend money, or

The provisions of law which should have been complied with, on or before the date of such publication, were not complied with, and an action, suit or proceeding contesting such validity is commenced within twenty days after such publication of the resolution authorizing the bonds, or, as to changes made by an amendatory resolution, within twenty days after such publication of such amendatory resolution, or

Such bonds were authorized in violation of the provisions of the constitution or laws of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-33.
Conclusiveness of authority’s classification of project and period of usefulness.

The determination of the authority, in the resolution authorizing bonds, as to the classification of the project for which such bonds are authorized and as to the maximum period of usefulness, shall be conclusive in any action or proceeding involving the validity of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-35.
Notice of sale of bonds.

Bonds issued under this chapter may be sold on sealed bids at public sale after publication of at least three (3) weekly notices, published in a financial publication carrying political subdivision bond notices and devoted primarily to financial news or to the subject of state and political subdivision bonds and having circulation among a large number of dealers in political subdivision bonds.

The public notice of sale shall describe the bonds or notes and set forth the terms and conditions of sale. It shall invite bidders to name the rate or rates of interest to be borne by the bonds or notes, which rate or rates shall be stated in conformity to the details of the issues as outlined in this chapter, all of which shall be included in the notice of sale.

The notice of sale may permit bidders to name one or more interest rates for the bonds or notes proposed to be sold, within such limitations as outlined in Section 61-3-41.

The notice of sale shall state that all bonds or notes will be awarded to the bidder whose bid constitutes the lowest cost to the authority. The lowest cost to the authority shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 61-3-41.

The notice of sale, in case of a sale of more than one (1) issue of bonds payable from the same source, after describing the separate issues, shall state the combined maturities as if such combined maturities constituted a single issue. The notice of sale shall state that the bonds or notes will be awarded to the bidder whose bid constitutes the lowest cost as determined by Section 61-3-41, and, as between bidders whose bids constitute the same lowest cost to the authority, such lowest bidders may negotiate between themselves, immediately after the announcement of said bids as to the conditions upon which the bid shall be awarded. If no agreement is reached, the award shall be determined by lot fairly and publicly drawn.

The notice of sale shall require all bidders except governmental agencies or departments to deposit a certified or cashier’s check for two percent (2%) of the amount of bonds or notes proposed to be sold, partially to secure the authority from any loss resulting from the failure of the bidder to comply with the terms of his bid. In case the bidder to whom the award is made shall fail to comply with the award, his certified or cashier’s check in the amount of two percent (2%) shall be forfeited to the authority. The certified or cashier’s checks of unsuccessful bidders shall be returned promptly.

Each notice of sale shall require the purchaser to pay interest accrued on the face amount of the bonds or notes awarded, at the rate borne thereby, from the date of the bonds or notes to the date of payment of the purchase price.

Each notice of sale shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids and shall state that any bid not complying with the terms of the notice shall be rejected.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter may be sold at a private sale in a manner and at a price determined by the authority to be the most advantageous to the authority.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter may be for not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par value. Any notice of sale shall state whether or not the bonds or notes will be sold for less than their par value.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230 § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-37.
Opening and award of bids; payment of premium.

All proposals or bids shall be submitted to the authority in a sealed envelope and subsequently opened publicly at the time and place stated in the notice of sale, and each bid shall be publicly announced at the time of opening of bids. A determination with respect to acceptance of a bid shall be made promptly after receipt of bids and, if a bid is accepted, a prompt award of the bonds or notes shall be made in writing to the successful bidder.

Bonds and notes shall be awarded to the bidder whose bid specifies the lowest maximum interest cost.

Any premium must be paid in bank funds as a part of the purchase price. Bids shall not contemplate the cancellation of any interest coupon or the waiver of interest or other concession by the bidder as a substitute for bank funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-39.
Payment of bonds.

All bonds except term bonds of a single issue shall be paid in consecutive annual or semiannual payments.

The first annual or semiannual principal payment upon each authorized issue shall be paid not more than thirty-six (36) months after the date of the bonds.

The last payment of each authorized issue of bonds shall mature not later than forty (40) years after its date of issue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-41.
Interest on bonds; details of bonds generally.

All bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not to exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-103. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid or as agreed to by the authority. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than two-thirds (2/3) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

All bonds shall be lithographed, engraved or typewritten, shall be in denominations of not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), shall be registered by the authority, and shall be consecutively numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued. The interest to accrue on each bond shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto, unless the bonds are fully registered no-coupon bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 42; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-43.
Execution of bonds.

All bonds and notes shall be executed in the name of the authority by the manual or facsimile signatures of such officials, including a financial officer, as may be designated by resolution and shall be under the seal (or a facsimile thereof) of the authority. At least one signature on each such bond or note shall be a manual signature. Coupons attached to a bond may be executed by the facsimile signature of the financial officer signing the bond.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230 § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-45.
Form of bonds and notes; registration.

Bonds may be issued in form payable to bearer with coupons attached for the payment of interest and, if so issued, shall be subject to registration as to principal only or as to both principal and interest. Bonds may also be issued in fully registered form without coupons. Coupon and registered bonds shall be interchangeable only as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds.

Notes may be issued in registered form or notes may be issued in form payable to bearer, with interest payable to bearer on presentation for endorsement and, if so issued, shall be subject to complete registration. Interest on notes issued in registered form and interest on bearer notes which have been registered shall be payable to the registered holder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-47.
Redemption of bonds and notes.

No bonds or notes shall be made payable on demand, but any bond or note may be made subject to redemption prior to maturity on such notice and at such time or times and with such redemption provisions as may be stated in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bond or note. When any such bond or note shall have been validly called for redemption and payment of the principal thereof and of the interest thereon accrued to the date of redemption shall have been tendered or made, interest thereon shall cease. A complete schedule of redemption dates shall be included in the resolution authorizing the bond issue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-49.
Securing of bond by trust agreement.

In the discretion of the authority, all bonds may be further secured by a trust agreement between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law.

The trust agreement may contain provisions for the issuance of additional bonds under the procedures established by this chapter for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter which shall be secured by the revenues pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein.

The trust agreement may include provisions to the effect that, if there is any default in the payment of principal or interest on any of said bonds, any court of competent jurisdiction may appoint a receiver to administer the properties and facilities of the authority described in the trust agreement on behalf of the authority, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities or commodities of the authority or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing the said receiver, and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding, or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of the said bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of such bonds and the said trust agreement. The fee for the services of any corporate trustee shall not exceed the normal charges for acting as paying agent, plus any additional amount or amounts allowed by the court as the reasonable value of services rendered by the corporate trustee.

The powers herein granted may be exercised whether or not a trust agreement is entered into and, if no trust agreement is entered into, such provisions as are above authorized may be set out in the resolution authorizing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-51.
Lien on revenues pledged to payment of bonds.

All revenues pledged to the payment of bonds shall be subject to a lien in favor of the holders of such bonds, and all such revenues received by the authority shall be immediately subject to such lien without any physical delivery thereof or further act by the authority. The lien shall be effective as against all parties asserting claims against the authority, whether by way of tort, contract or otherwise, whether or not such parties may have had notice of such lien. The pledge or trust agreement creating the same need not be filed or recorded except in the official minutes of the authority. The revenues may also be pledged as security for the payment of obligations due providers of credit enhancement with respect to any bonds issued.

The state does hereby covenant with the holders of any such bonds that it will not, while any such bonds shall be outstanding, limit or diminish the right and power of the authority to establish, maintain and collect rates, fees, rentals and other charges pledged to the payment of such bonds, or to fulfill any covenants with respect to rates, fees, rentals and other charges made by the authority with such bondholders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-53.
Refunding bonds.

Any authority, authorized by a statute other than this chapter to refund its outstanding bonds and permitted to do so by the terms of any resolutions and trust agreements pertaining to such bonds, may refund all, or any part of, one or more bond issues. However, the refunding bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In no case shall any bonds be refunded whereby:

The interest cost to the authority computed on the basis of the interest rates borne by the bonds refunded and by the refunding bonds, will be increased by reason of the refunding; or

The average maturity of the bonds refunded, computed to their stated maturities will be increased by reason of the refunding; or

The time at which bonds may be redeemed is more than twelve (12) months after the date of sale of the refunding bonds;

However, if it can be clearly shown that the refunding is being accomplished to prevent default or to provide flexibility to the authority in the financing of its projects, and if the State Treasurer shall certify that the need to refund an outstanding issue to prevent default or to provide flexibility to the authority in the financing of its projects has been determined by sufficient evidence filed with the State Treasurer, the provisions of subsections (a), (b) and (c) shall not prevent refunding.

It shall not be necessary for the bonds refunded to be surrendered and cancelled simultaneously with the delivery of the refunding bonds, but the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds, not used to pay for surrendered and cancelled bonds at the time of refunding, shall be deposited in a trust fund under conditions satisfactory to the authority and the State Treasurer.

If the refunding bonds are being issued to prevent default, the authority may exchange them with bondholders under such rules and regulations as established by the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 520, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1991).

§ 61-3-55.
Redemption of bonds and notes.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to confer on any authority any right or option to redeem any bonds or notes heretofore or hereafter issued, except as is or may be provided in the proceedings under which such bonds were or shall be issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-57.
Negotiability of bonds, notes and coupons.

All bonds and notes and appurtenant coupons issued pursuant to this chapter shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-59.
Bonds not to be delivered until validated.

No bonds shall be delivered to any purchaser by any authority unless they shall have first been validated in accordance with the provisions of Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-60.
Short term borrowing by airport authorities.

In addition to the power to borrow money pursuant to Sections 61-3-27 through 61-3-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, an airport authority may, in anticipation of the receipt of income, revenues, grants or subsidies from any source, including, but not limited to, the federal government or any federal agency, the state or any state agency, any municipality or taxing authority, or the proceeds of bonds authorized by Sections 61-3-27 through 61-3-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, borrow money to be payable over a period of time not to exceed ten (10) years, in an amount or amounts not to exceed in the aggregate Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) for the purposes and under the terms and conditions set out in subsections (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section.

Any loans made under this section shall be first authorized by resolution of the airport authority setting out the need for such loan, the purposes for which the proceeds shall be used, and the source or sources from which it anticipates that the loan shall be retired. The purposes for which such loans are authorized may include any purposes for which bonds may be issued under this chapter and for the maintenance and repair of runways, taxiways, ramps or other facilities necessary for the safe, orderly and convenient handling of aircraft traffic; and for the employment of personnel and purchase of supplies and equipment and payment of expenses which, in the judgment of the authority, shall be necessary or convenient in the safe operation of the airport facilities. The resolution shall also set out the schedule of repayment and may pledge therefor any anticipated funds not previously pledged to the retirement of the loan or loans.

The loans authorized by this section may be made by any bank located in the State of Mississippi or by any trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having the authority to enter into such loans. The loans may bear interest at a rate not to exceed thirteen percent (13%) per annum. The loans shall be evidenced by the notes of the airport authority and shall not constitute a debt of the commissioners thereof, and the lender shall have the right of mandamus and any other appropriate writ or legal or equitable remedy for the collection of the notes and the cost of collection.

In order to provide for, and in connection with, such short-term borrowings, an airport authority is authorized to enter into any note, loan, credit agreement or agreements, or other agreement or agreements necessary therefor containing provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

The interest on the notes authorized by this section shall at all times be exempt from all taxation in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 404, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003.).

§ 61-3-61.
Exemption from taxation of interest on bonds and notes.

The accomplishment of the purposes stated in this chapter being for the benefit of the people of this state and for the improvement of their properties and industries, the authority, in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, will be performing an essential public function, and the interest on the bonds and notes issued hereunder shall at all times be free from taxation within this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-63.
Factors to be considered by authority in determining cost of project.

In determining the amount to be expended for a project pursuant to this chapter, the authority may include the engineering, legal, fiscal, architectural, inspection, recording, printing, publishing and related cost of the acquisition, construction or reconstruction of the property or improvement to be financed, including interest during construction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-40; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 10; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 35, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 61-3-65.
Exercise of incidental powers; issuance of general obligation municipal bonds for airport facilities; adoption of rules and regulations for management of airports.

In addition to the general and special powers conferred by this chapter, every authority is authorized to exercise such powers as are necessarily incidental to the exercise of such general and special powers.

The governing authority of each municipality, as defined herein, shall have the authority to issue general obligation bonds of the municipality, as defined herein, for the purposes set out in Sections 61-5-17 and 19-9-1(j). For the purposes of this chapter, the portion of the county, being a supervisors district or supervisors districts, or that portion of the county lying outside the territorial boundary of the other participating municipalities, shall constitute a special taxing district and for all purposes under this chapter, taxes may be levied upon the property therein and such territory shall be considered a municipality for the issuance of bonds for the purposes of this chapter. Bonds issued pursuant to authority contained in this section shall, if issued by a city, town or village, be issued in conformity with the uniform system for the issuance of municipal bonds, as set out in Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-329, inclusive, and, if issued by a special taxing district, be issued by the board of supervisors of the county, and shall be issued in conformity with the uniform system for the issuance of county bonds, being Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31, inclusive.

The regional airport authority shall have the power and authority to adopt all rules and regulations appropriate to the management of the airport and the activities conducted thereon, including the establishment of all rules and regulations with respect to automobiles and other traffic, the storage and disposition of property, including automobiles, and the disposition thereof of any unclaimed vehicles within a reasonable time. Such rules and regulations shall be posted in an accessible place at the airport terminal and shall be enforced by the courts of the county in which the airport is located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-48; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 18; Laws, 1978, ch. 362, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 61-3-67.
Joint operations; authorization.

For the purposes of Sections 61-3-67 through 61-3-75, unless otherwise qualified, the term “public agency” includes municipality and authority, each as defined in this chapter, any agency of the state government and of the United States, and any municipality, political subdivision and agency of an adjoining state. The term “governing body” includes the commissioners of an authority, the governing body of a municipality, and the head of an agency of a state or the United States if the public agency is other than an authority or municipality.

All powers, privileges, and authority granted by this chapter may be exercised and enjoyed by an authority jointly with any public agency of this state, and jointly with any public agency of any adjoining state or of the United States to the extent that the laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise of enjoyment. Any agency of the state government, when acting jointly with any authority, may exercise and enjoy all the powers, privileges, and authority conferred by this chapter upon an authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 14.

§ 61-3-69.
Joint operations; agreement.

Any two or more public agencies may enter into agreements with each other for joint action pursuant to the provisions of Section 61-3-67. Each agreement shall specify its duration, the proportionate interest which each public agency shall have in the property, facilities, and privileges involved in the joint undertaking, the proportion of costs of operation, etc., to be borne by each public agency, and such other terms as are deemed necessary or required by law. The agreement may also provide for amendments and termination; disposal of all or any of the property, facilities, and privileges jointly owned, prior to or at such time as said property, facilities, and privileges, or any part thereof, cease to be used for the purposes provided in this chapter, or upon termination of the agreement; the distribution of the proceeds received upon any disposal, and of any funds or other property jointly owned and undisposed of; the assumption or payment of any indebtedness arising from the joint undertaking which remains unpaid upon the disposal of all assets or upon a termination of the agreement; and such other provisions as may be necessary or convenient.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 14.

§ 61-3-71.
Joint operations; joint board generally.

Public agencies acting jointly pursuant to Section 61-3-67 shall create a joint board which shall consist of members appointed by the governing body of each participating public agency. The number to be appointed, their term and compensation, if any, shall be provided for in the joint agreement. Each joint board shall organize, select officers for such terms as are fixed by the agreement, and adopt and amend, from time to time, rules for its own procedure. The joint board shall have power, as agent of the participating public agencies, to plan, acquire, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, lease, regulate, protect, and police any airport or other air navigation facility, airport hazard or other airport property, real or personal, to be jointly acquired, controlled, and operated and to lease any property, real or personal, inside or outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties. The board may be authorized by the participating public agencies to exercise on behalf of its constituent public agencies all the powers of each with respect to the airport, air navigation facility, airport hazard, or other airport property, real or personal, subject to the limitations of Section 61-3-73.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 14; Laws, 1985, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 1985).

§ 61-3-73.
Joint operations; limitation of powers of joint board.

The total expenditures to be made by the joint board for any purpose in any calendar year shall be as determined by a budget approved by the constituent public agencies on or before the preceding October 1st, or as otherwise specifically authorized by the constituent public agencies.

No airport, air navigation facility, airport hazard, or real or personal property, the cost of which is in excess of sums fixed therefor by the joint agreement or allotted in the annual budget, may be acquired, established, or developed by the joint board without the approval of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies.

Eminent domain proceedings may be instituted by the joint board only by authority of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies of the joint board. If so authorized, such proceedings shall be instituted in the names of the constituent public agencies jointly, and the property so acquired shall be held by said public agencies as tenants in common.

The joint board shall not dispose of any airport, air navigation facility, or real property under its jurisdiction except with the consent of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies. However, the joint board may, without such consent, enter into contracts, leases, or other arrangements contemplated by Section 61-3-21.

Any resolutions, rules, regulations, or orders of the joint board dealing with subjects authorized by Section 61-3-23 shall become effective only upon approval of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies. Upon such approval, the resolutions, rules, regulations, or orders of the joint board shall have the same force and effect in the territories or jurisdictions involved as the ordinances, resolutions, rules, regulations, or orders of each public agency would have in its own territory or jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 14.

§ 61-3-75.
Joint operations; joint fund.

For the purpose of providing the joint board with moneys for the necessary expenditures in carrying out the provisions of Sections 61-3-67 through 61-3-75, a joint fund shall be created and maintained into which shall be deposited the share of each of the constituent public agencies as provided by the joint agreement. Any federal, state, or other grants, contributions, or loans, and the revenues obtained from the joint ownership, control, and operation of any airport or air navigation facility under the jurisdiction of the joint board, shall be paid into the joint fund. Disbursements from such fund shall be made by order of the board, subject to the limitations prescribed in Section 61-3-73.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-44; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 14.

§ 61-3-77.
Exemption from taxation of airport property and income.

Any property in this state acquired by an authority for airport purposes pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and any income derived by the authority from the ownership, operation, or control thereof, shall be exempt from taxation to the same extent as other property belonging to political subdivisions of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7545-46; Laws, 1958, ch. 230, § 15.